Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-220
Solicitor, defined.

Solicitor means any person, who is not the seller offering a prize promotion, who represents to an individual that the individual has won or will receive a prize.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 82.